Arkansas, session 2025, HB1528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-903, concerning report cards provided
by each public school district to each student, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(d) A student's report card provided under this section shall include
a statement regarding the student's current reading grade level.











*TNL226*
02/18/2025 2:23:11 PM TNL226